Utah statutes.
31A-15-110.   Reporting of illegal insurance.

(1)  Every person investigating or adjusting any loss or claim on a subject of insurance in this state shall immediately report to the commissioner every insurance policy or contract connected with the investigation or settlement, which the person has reason to believe has been entered into illegally by any insurer not authorized to transact business in this state.

(2)  Every person acting as an insurance consultant shall immediately report to the commissioner every insurance policy or contract covering a subject of insurance in this state, which the consultant has reason to believe has been entered into illegally by an insurer not authorized to transact that type of insurance in this state.



Amended by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

